Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the director of Explore Minnesota for a grant to Twin Cities In Motion for costs related to hosting the Twin Cities Marathon. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end